District of Columbia statutes.
5-746

Computation of pension of certain retired officers.

In computing the pension relief allowance or retirement compensation of any such individual retired before July 1, 1953, as Major and Superintendent of Police, Assistant Superintendent of Police, Chief Engineer of the Fire Department, Deputy Chief Engineer of the Fire Department, or Battalion Chief Engineer of the Fire Department of the District of Columbia, such person shall, for the purposes of this act, be deemed to have retired as Chief of Police, Deputy Chief of Police, Fire Chief, Deputy Fire Chief, or Battalion Fire Chief, respectively.

History

June 20, 1953, 67 Stat. 75, ch. 143, title III, § 302

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-606.
1973 Ed., § 4-519.

References in Text

“This act,” referred to in this section, means the Act of June 20, 1953, 67 Stat. 75, ch. 143.